Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2635
Family Child Care Home Grant Program; department; duties; grant; application; use.

(1) The Family Child Care Home Grant Program is created and shall be administered by the department.

(2) The department shall provide grants for new and existing licensed family child care home programs in residential and nonresidential facilities and to create regional facilitator hubs in order to provide administrative and technical support to new and existing licensed family child care home programs in residential and nonresidential facilities.

(3) Any licensed child care provider, nonprofit organization, for-profit organization, community foundation, school, or regional facilitator hub or any other entity specified in rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the department may apply for a grant under the Family Child Care Home Grant Program.

(4) A grant recipient under the Family Child Care Home Grant Program shall only use the grant to provide financial or other support to:

(a) An existing licensed family child care program in a residential or nonresidential building that is licensed to serve up to twelve children of mixed ages;

(b) Create a new licensed family child care home program in a residential or nonresidential building that is licensed to serve up to twelve children of mixed ages; or

(c) Regional facilitator hubs that will provide administrative and technical support to family child care home programs.

Laws 2024, LB164, § 39.